Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.200

Violation—Infraction.

(1) It is a violation of this chapter and an infraction for any contractor to:

(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;

(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or revoked;

(c) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to another contractor;

(d) If the contractor is a [plumbing] contractor as defined in RCW 18.106.010, violate RCW 18.106.320; or

(e) Subcontract to, or use, an unregistered contractor.

(2) Each day that a contractor works without being registered as required by this chapter, works while the contractor's registration is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration issued to another contractor is a separate infraction. Each worksite at which a contractor works without being registered as required by this chapter, works while the contractor's registration is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration issued to another contractor is a separate infraction.

[ 2007 c 436 s 9; 2002 c 82 s 6; 1997 c 314 s 14; 1993 c 454 s 7; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—1993 c 454: See note following RCW 18.27.010.

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: "Sections 1 through 17 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1984." [ 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 24.]

Prohibited acts—Criminal penalties: RCW 18.27.020.